Maryland, session 2025, HB0541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
2.5–110.
– 1 –

Ch. 315 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) THERE IS A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS NAVIGATOR IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE SECRETARY SHALL DESIGNATE THE NAVIGATOR.
(C) THE NAVIGATOR SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS IN OBTAINING ACCESS TO AND APPLYING FOR STATE GRANT
PROGRAMS;
(2) WORK WITH NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS AND UNITS OF STATE
GOVERNMENT TO RESOLVE PROCEDURAL COMPLEXITIES AND DELAYS IN STATE
GRANT–MAKING PROCESSES;
(3) COLLECT AND SHARE INFORMATION ON OPPORTUNITIES FOR
FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL GRANTS WITH NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS; AND
(4) REPRESENT NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS’ INTERESTS AND
CONCERNS AS A MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND EFFICIENT GRANT APPLICATION
COUNCIL ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–209 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
2–209.
(a) In this section, “Council” means the Maryland Efficient Grant Application
Council.
(b) There is a Maryland Efficient Grant Application Council.
(c) (1) The Council consists of the following members:
(i) the Chief Procurement Officer, or the Chief Procurement
Officer’s designee;
(ii) the State Treasurer, or the State Treasurer’s designee;
(iii) the Comptroller, or the Comptroller’s designee;
(iv) the Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 315
(v) the Secretary of Budget and Management, or the Secretary’s
designee;
(vi) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(vii) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(viii) the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(ix) the Secretary of Agriculture, or the Secretary’s designee;
(x) the Secretary of the Environment, or the Secretary’s designee;
(xi) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the State
Superintendent’s designee;
(xii) the Director of the Maryland Energy Administration, or the
Director’s designee;
(xiii) the Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of Crime
Prevention and Policy, or the Executive Director’s designee;
(xiv) the chair of the Maryland Higher Education Commission, or the
chair’s designee;
(xv) the Secretary of Natural Resources, or the Secretary’s designee;
(xvi) THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS NAVIGATOR, OR THE
NAVIGATOR’S DESIGNEE, WHO SHALL SERVE AS A NONVOTING MEMBER;
(XVII) a representative from the Maryland Association of Counties;
[(xvii)] (XVIII) a representative from the Maryland Municipal
League;
[(xviii)] (XIX) five representatives of private nonprofit
organizations with experience providing services funded by State or federal grants and that
reflect the size and diversity of the nonprofit grant recipients in the State, appointed by the
Governor;
[(xix)] (XX) one representative of a private nonprofit organization,
appointed by the President of the Senate; and
[(xx)] (XXI) one representative of a private nonprofit organization,
appointed by the Speaker of the House.
– 3 –

Ch. 315 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (i) This paragraph applies to members of the Council appointed
under paragraph [(1)(xviii)] (1)(XIX) of this subsection.
(ii) The term of a member is 4 years.
(iii) The terms of members are staggered as required by the terms
provided for members of the Council on July 1, 2020.
(iv) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a
successor is appointed and qualifies.
(v) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only
for the rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(vi) The Governor may remove a member for neglect of duty,
incompetence or misconduct.
(d) The Secretary of Budget and Management, or the Secretary’s designee shall
serve as Chair of the Council.
(e) The staffing responsibilities of the Council shall be shared by the agencies
represented on the Council.
(f) A member of the Council:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Council; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State Budget.
(g) The Council shall:
(1) advise the Department of Budget and Management on the
implementation of § 2–210 of this subtitle; and
(2) monitor and report to the Department of Budget and Management on
the State’s progress towards implementing § 2–210 of this subtitle.
2–210.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Council” means the Maryland Efficient Grant Application Council
established under § 2–209 of this subtitle.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 315
(3) “Department” means the Department of Budget and Management.
(4) (i) “Grant” means a legal instrument of financial assistance
between a State grant–making entity and a non–State entity that is:
1. used to enter into a relationship the principal purpose of
which is to transfer anything of value from the grant–making entity to the grant recipient
to carry out a public purpose authorized by law and not to acquire property or services for
the direct benefit or use of the grant–making entity; and
2. distinguished from a cooperative agreement in that it does
not provide for substantial involvement between the grant–making entity and the grant
recipient in carrying out the activity contemplated by the award.
(ii) “Grant” does not include an instrument that provides only:
1. direct government cash assistance to an individual;
2. a subsidy;
3. a loan;
4. a loan guarantee;
5. insurance;
6. grants made by the State higher education system, the
capital budget, the Department of Transportation, or the Maryland Technology
Development Corporation;
7. business development grants made by the Department of
Commerce; or
8. any State funding that is required annually and is
calculated through a formula set in statute.
(5) “Grant application form” means a grant application template and
related materials required to be submitted by grant applicants, including:
(i) required organizational materials; and
(ii) proposed budget categories and line items.
(6) “Uniform Guidance” means the Office of Management and Budget
Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for
Federal Awards, 2 C.F.R. Part 200.
– 5 –

Ch. 315 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) In order to improve efficiency, streamline and reduce redundant
processes, reduce paperwork and administrative burdens on both granting agencies and
grant recipients, and facilitate development and implementation of a statewide centralized
grants management and accountability system, the Council shall study and make
recommendations to the Department regarding the entire grants life cycle, including:
(i) the creation of the following materials for use by grant–making
agencies, grant applicants, and grant recipients in the State:
1. a uniform grant application form;
2. uniform financial controls and reporting requirements for
grant recipients; and
3. uniform performance progress reporting requirements for
grant recipients;
(ii) [the creation of a State Grants Ombudsperson to provide
technical assistance with:
1. accessing and navigating State grant programs;
2. resolving delays in the grant–making process; and
3. collecting and disseminating information on opportunities
for grants from federal, State, and local government;
(iii)] regulations adopting each part of the uniform guidance, with
appropriate modifications for its application to grant–making entities in the State,
including modifications or variances based on the scope or size of particular grant
programs, grant–making entities, or grantees;
[(iv)] (III) recommended timeframes and deadlines for the various
tasks included in items (i) [through (iii)] AND (II) of this paragraph;
[(v)] (IV) recommended deadlines for use and implementation by
the various grant–making entities of the materials prepared in accordance with item (i) of
this paragraph; and
[(vi)] (V) recommended deadlines for grant–making entities to
administer State and federal grants in accordance with the provisions of parts of uniform
guidance as adopted by the Department by regulation.
(2) In developing materials and recommendations under this subsection,
the Council shall:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 315
(i) solicit the input of diverse stakeholders, including grant–making
agencies and organizations representing local governments, grant professionals, experts in
nonprofit accounting and auditing, and nonprofit service providers; and
(ii) establish one or more issue working groups, composed of
stakeholders representing diverse backgrounds appropriate to the charge of each
workgroup, and also reflecting the demographic diversity of the State and the diversity of
grant programs and grant recipients, including arts, history, and social service, to
participate in and facilitate the process of developing recommendations.
(c) On or before July 1, 2027, the Council shall submit a report on its full
recommendations as required by subsection (b)(1) of this section to the Department and the
General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(d) On or before October 1, 2020, each State grant–making agency shall appoint
a Chief Accountability Officer who shall:
(1) serve as a liaison to the Council and the Department; and
(2) be responsible for the agency’s representation and participation in the
process established under this section.
(e) The Department shall provide technical assistance and interpretations of
policy requirements in order to ensure the effective and efficient implementation of this
section.
Chapter 28 of the Acts of 2024
[SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Efficient Grant Application Council shall:
(1) study the feasibility, cost, and impacts of designating a State Grants
Ombudsperson in accordance with § 2–210(b)(1)(ii) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) on or before July 1, 2025, make recommendations regarding the
designation of a State Grants Ombudsperson, including recommended timelines and
deadlines, to the Department of Budget and Management.
(b) On or before December 31, 2025, the Department of Budget and Management
shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, report to the General
Assembly on the recommendations made by the Maryland Efficient Grant Application
Council under subsection (a) of this section.]
– 7 –

Ch. 315 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Chapter 29 of the Acts of 2024
[SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Efficient Grant Application Council shall:
(1) study the feasibility, cost, and impacts of designating a State Grants
Ombudsperson in accordance with § 2–210(b)(1)(ii) of the State Finance and Procurement
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) on or before July 1, 2025, make recommendations regarding the
designation of a State Grants Ombudsperson, including recommended timelines and
deadlines, to the Department of Budget and Management.
(b) On or before December 31, 2025, the Department of Budget and Management
shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, report to the General
Assembly on the recommendations made by the Maryland Efficient Grant Application
Council under subsection (a) of this section.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
2.5–110.
(a) There is a nonprofit organizations navigator in the Department.
(b) The Secretary shall designate the navigator.
(c) The navigator shall:
(1) provide technical assistance to nonprofit organizations in obtaining
access to and applying for State grant programs;
(2) work with nonprofit organizations and units of State government to
resolve procedural complexities and delays in State grant–making processes; AND
(3) collect and share information on opportunities for federal, State, and
local grants with nonprofit organizations[; and
(4) represent nonprofit organizations’ interests and concerns as a member
of the Maryland Efficient Grant Application Council established under § 2–209 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article].
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 315
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that the nonprofit organization navigator position established under Section 1 of
this Act shall be filled on or before January 1, 2026 July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect on the taking effect of the termination provision specified in Section 4 of Chapters
484 and 485 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2020. If the termination date of Chapters
484 or 485 is amended, Section 2 of this Act shall take effect on the termination of Chapters
484 or 485. This Act may not be interpreted to have any effect on that termination provision.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That,:
(a) On or before January 1, 2027, the Department of Commerce shall report to
the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and Government Operations
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the following
information for fiscal year 2026:
(1) the number of nonprofit organizations that received technical
assistance from the navigator in accordance with Section 1 of this Act;
(2) the total number of grant applications completed and submitted by
nonprofit organizations in the State as a result of receiving technical assistance from the
navigator in accordance with Section 1 of this Act;
(3) the total amount of grant funds awarded to nonprofit organizations in
the State as a result of receiving technical assistance from the navigator in accordance with
Section 1 of this Act; and
(4) any findings and recommendations of the Department regarding the
implementation of Section 1 of this Act.
(b) The Department shall collect sufficient information from the nonprofit
organizations that receive technical assistance in accordance with Section 1 of this Act to
complete the report required under subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025 is an emergency measure, is necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has been passed by a yea and
nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses of
the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is enacted. It shall remain
effective through June 30, 2027, and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this Act, with no further
action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and
effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 9 –